District of Columbia statutes.
1-1507.01

Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1986

(Effective February 4, 1987)

Prepared by the Mayor and transmitted to the Council of the District of Columbia on November 3, 1986, pursuant to the provisions of Section 422(12) of the District Charter.

DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA BOARD OF PAROLE

I.

Transfer

The Office of Parole Supervision is hereby transferred from the District of Columbia Department of Corrections to the District of Columbia Board of Parole, to be under the supervision of the Chair of the Board. The Chair shall carry out the functions, duties and authorities transferred to the Board.

II.

Purpose

The mission of the Board of Parole is to determine if and when it is appropriate to grant parole to an offender who has served the minimum term in prison ordered by the court. In granting parole, the Board determines 1) the terms and conditions of such parole; 2) the standards of supervision for parolees or mandatory release; and, 3) if and when to terminate a parole or mandatory release, as well as whether to modify the terms and conditions thereof.

III.

Function

The function transferred to the Board of Parole:

To establish policy and standards, and to administer the parole supervision function.

IV.

Transfer of Functions

All functions and authority of the Department of Corrections related to parole supervision, established pursuant to Commissioner's Order No. 7, dated December 26, 1967, as amended, are hereby transferred to the Board of Parole.

All Department of Corrections positions, personnel, property, records and unexpended balance of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the duties and functions assigned herein, are hereby transferred to the Board of Parole. These funds are to be used only for the purposes for which the appropriation or allocation was originally made. All authority for parole supervision services previously authorized or delegated to the Department of Corrections is hereby transferred to the Board of Parole.

V.

Rescission

All orders and parts of orders in conflict with any of the provisions of this plan are, to the extent of such conflict, hereby repealed, except that any municipal regulations adopted or promulgated by virtue of the authority granted by such orders, shall remain in force until properly revised, amended or rescinded.

No agency of the District of Columbia government is abolished as a consequence of this reorganization. An amendment to Organization Order No. 7 shall be made so as to exclude parole supervision from the functions of the Department of Corrections.

VI.

Effective Date

This Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1986 shall become effective in accordance with Section 422(12) of Public Law 93-198, or on a date thereafter to be designated pursuant to Executive Order of the Mayor.

2001 Ed., Title 1, Chapter 15, Subchapter VII, Part A.